Maryland, session 2025, HB0880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–903.
(a) [(1)] An advertisement for a cannabis licensee, cannabis product, or
cannabis–related service may not:
[(i)] (1) violate Title 13, Subtitle 3 of the Commercial Law Article;
[(ii)] (2) directly or indirectly target individuals under the age of 21
years;
[(iii)] (3) contain a design, an illustration, a picture, or a
representation that:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0880*

HOUSE BILL 880
[1.] (I) targets or is attractive to minors, including a
cartoon character, a mascot, or any other depiction that is commonly used to market
products to minors;
[2.] (II) displays the use of cannabis, including the
consumption, smoking, or vaping of cannabis;
[3.] (III) encourages or promotes cannabis for use as an
intoxicant; or
[4.] (IV) is obscene; OR
[(iv)] (4) engage in advertising by means of television, radio,
Internet, mobile application, social media, or other electronic communication, event
sponsorship, or print publication, unless at least 85% of the audience is reasonably expected
to be at least 21 years old as determined by reliable and current audience composition
data[; or
(v) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, engage in
advertising by means of placing an advertisement on the side of a building or another
publicly visible location of any form, including a sign, a poster, a placard, a device, a graphic
display, an outdoor billboard, or a freestanding signboard.
(2) A cannabis business may place exterior signage on the premises of the
business for the limited purpose of identifying the business to the public].
(b) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, each
cannabis–related website shall employ a neutral age–screening mechanism that verifies
that the user is at least 21 years old, including by using an age–gate, age–screen, or age
verification mechanism before the user may access or view any content and before the
website may collect the user’s address, e–mail address, phone number, or contact
information to disseminate advertisements.
(ii) If a website is appropriate for a qualifying patient who is under
the age of 21 years, the website shall provide an alternative screening mechanism for the
qualifying patient.
(2) An advertisement placed on social media or a mobile application shall
include a notification that an individual must be at least 21 years old to view the content.
(3) The provisions of this subtitle applicable to cannabis licensees may not
be avoided by hiring or contracting with a third party, or outsourcing advertisements that
do not comply with this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 880 3
(4) A cannabis licensee may not allow the use of the licensee’s trademarks,
brands, names, locations, or other distinguishing characteristics for third–party use for
advertisements that do not comply with this subtitle.
(c) The Administration shall adopt regulations to establish procedures for the
enforcement of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.